Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3136
Tax credit; amount; limitations.

(1) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2025, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an eligible taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 or any tax imposed by sections 77-907 to 77-918 or 77-3801 to 77-3807 for qualified shortline railroad maintenance expenditures.

(2) The credit provided in this section shall be a nonrefundable tax credit equal to fifty percent of the qualified shortline railroad maintenance expenditures incurred during the taxable year by the eligible taxpayer. The amount of the credit may not exceed an amount equal to one thousand five hundred dollars multiplied by the number of miles of railroad track owned or leased in the state by the eligible taxpayer at the end of the taxable year.

(3) The total amount of tax credits allowed in a fiscal year under the Nebraska Shortline Rail Modernization Act shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 16;

Laws 2025, LB650, § 49.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.